Rhode Island statutes. Title 12 Criminal Procedure
Chapter 19.1 Judicial Sentencing Disclosure Act

12-19.1-1.
Short title.

This chapter may be cited as the “Rhode Island Judicial Sentencing Disclosure Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 192, § 1.

12-19.1-2.
Record of criminal sentences.

The clerks of the district and superior courts shall maintain a register listing under the name of each judge all criminal convictions over which the judge has presided, in chronological order, to include the following information:

The name of the case;

The charges against the defendant;

The charges of which the defendant was convicted;

The sentence handed down by the judge; and

The date the sentence was handed down.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 192, § 1; P.L. 2000, ch. 109, § 15.

12-19.1-3.
Public record.

The register shall be a public record of the state and shall be available for inspection at the office of the clerk during regular office hours and at any other times that may be provided by law.

History of Section.

P.L. 1977, ch. 192, § 1.